Idaho, session 2026, S1372.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-144, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-144. IDAHO EDUCATION WHISTLEBLOWER PROTECTION ACT. (1) The legis-
lature recognizes that fear of retaliation discourages reporting of miscon-
duct and that strong protections are necessary to safeguard students.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Educational entity" means any public school district, public
charter school, private school, the state department of education,
or any other entity that provides K-12 education and receives public
funds.
(b) "Protected activity" means any of the following actions taken in
good faith:
(i) Reporting or attempting to report to law enforcement sexual
misconduct or a violation of a law, rule, policy, or professional
standard related to student safety;
(ii) Participating in, cooperating with, or providing informa-
tion in an investigation, proceeding, or hearing pertaining to al-
leged sexual misconduct or a violation of a law, rule, policy, or
professional standard related to student safety; or
(iii) Refusing to participate in the concealment of such miscon-
duct.
(c) "Retaliation" means any adverse employment or contractual action
taken against a whistleblower because of protected activity, including
termination, demotion, contract nonrenewal, reassignment, suspension,
harassment, reduction in pay or hours, or any other action that would
dissuade a reasonable person from reporting misconduct.
(d) "Whistleblower" means any employee, applicant, or school personnel
who reports or assists in reporting, in good faith, sexual misconduct or
a violation of a law, rule, policy, or professional standard related to
student safety.
(3) An educational entity shall not retaliate against a whistleblower
for reporting misconduct, participating in investigations, or refusing to
conceal misconduct.


(4) Adverse employment action taken within six (6) weeks of protected
activity is presumed to be retaliation unless proven otherwise by clear and
convincing evidence.
(5) A whistleblower who experiences retaliation in violation of this
section may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction against
an educational entity and shall be entitled to monetary damages and attor-
ney's fees.
(6) The provisions of this section shall apply to whistleblower pro-
tected activity taken on and after July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.